oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SFX G u igendan u
SFX G u igende u
SFX G u igend’ u
SFX G u igend' u
SFX G u igendo u
SFX G u igendoj u
SFX G u igendojn u
SFX G u igendon u
SFX G o igi o
SFX G o igas o
SFX G o igis o
SFX G o igos o
SFX G o igus o
SFX G o igu o
SFX G o iginta o
SFX G o igintaj o
SFX G o igintajn o
SFX G o igintan o
SFX G o iginte o
SFX G o igint’ o
SFX G o igint' o
SFX G o iginto o
SFX G o igintoj o
SFX G o igintojn o
SFX G o iginton o
SFX G o iganta o
SFX G o igantaj o
SFX G o igantajn o
SFX G o igantan o
SFX G o igante o
SFX G o igant’ o
SFX G o igant' o
SFX G o iganto o
SFX G o igantoj o
SFX G o igantojn o
SFX G o iganton o
SFX G o igonta o
SFX G o igontaj o
SFX G o igontajn o
SFX G o igontan o
SFX G o igonte o
SFX G o igont’ o
SFX G o igont' o
SFX G o igonto o
SFX G o igontoj o
SFX G o igontojn o
SFX G o igonton o
SFX G o igintina o
SFX G o igintinaj o
SFX G o igintinajn o
SFX G o igintinan o
SFX G o igintin’ o
SFX G o igintin' o
SFX G o igintino o
SFX G o igintinoj o
SFX G o igintinojn o
SFX G o igintinon o
SFX G o igantina o
SFX G o igantinaj o
SFX G o igantinajn o
SFX G o igantinan o
SFX G o igantin’ o
SFX G o igantin' o
SFX G o igantino o
SFX G o igantinoj o
SFX G o igantinojn o
SFX G o igantinon o
SFX G o igontina o
SFX G o igontinaj o
SFX G o igontinajn o
SFX G o igontinan o
SFX G o igontin’ o
SFX G o igontin' o
SFX G o igontino o
SFX G o igontinoj o
SFX G o igontinojn o
SFX G o igontinon o
SFX G o iga o
SFX G o igaj o
SFX G o igajn o
SFX G o igan o
SFX G o ige o
SFX G o ig’ o
SFX G o ig' o
SFX G o igo o
SFX G o igoj o
SFX G o igojn o
SFX G o igon o
SFX G o igita o
SFX G o igitaj o
SFX G o igitajn o
SFX G o igitan o
SFX G o igite o
SFX G o igit’ o
SFX G o igit' o
SFX G o igito o
SFX G o igitoj o
SFX G o igitojn o
SFX G o igiton o
SFX G o igata o
SFX G o igataj o
SFX G o igatajn o
SFX G o igatan o
SFX G o igate o
SFX G o igat’ o
SFX G o igat' o
SFX G o igato o
SFX G o igatoj o
SFX G o igatojn o
SFX G o igaton o
SFX G o igota o
SFX G o igotaj o
SFX G o igotajn o
SFX G o igotan o
SFX G o igote o
SFX G o igot’ o
SFX G o igot' o
SFX G o igoto o
SFX G o igotoj o
SFX G o igotojn o
SFX G o igoton o
SFX G o igeblas o
SFX G o igeblis o
SFX G o igeblos o
SFX G o igeblus o
SFX G o igebla o
SFX G o igeblaj o
SFX G o igeblajn o
SFX G o igeblan o
SFX G o igeble o
SFX G o igebl’ o
SFX G o igebl' o
SFX G o igeblo o
SFX G o igeblon o
SFX G o igendas o
SFX G o igendis o
SFX G o igendos o
SFX G o igendus o
SFX G o igenda o
SFX G o igendaj o
SFX G o igendajn o
SFX G o igendan o
SFX G o igende o
SFX G o igend’ o
SFX G o igend' o
SFX G o igendo o
SFX G o igendoj o
SFX G o igendojn o
SFX G o igendon o
SFX G o igadi o
SFX G o igadas o
SFX G o igadis o
SFX G o igados o
SFX G o igadus o
SFX G o igadu o
SFX G o igada o
SFX G o igadaj o
SFX G o igadajn o
SFX G o igadan o
SFX G o igade o
SFX G o igad’ o
SFX G o igad' o
SFX G o igado o
SFX G o igadoj o
SFX G o igadojn o
SFX G o igadon o
SFX H N 33
SFX H a uja a
SFX H a ujaj a
SFX H a ujajn a
SFX H a ujan a
SFX H a uje a
SFX H a uj’ a
SFX H a uj' a
SFX H a ujo a
SFX H a ujoj a
SFX H a ujojn a
SFX H a ujon a
SFX H i uja i
SFX H i ujaj i
SFX H i ujajn i
SFX H i ujan i
SFX H i uje i
SFX H i uj’ i
SFX H i uj' i
SFX H i ujo i
SFX H i ujoj i
SFX H i ujojn i
SFX H i ujon i
SFX H o uja o
SFX H o ujaj o
SFX H o ujajn o
SFX H o ujan o
SFX H o uje o
SFX H o uj’ o
SFX H o uj' o
SFX H o ujo o
SFX H o ujoj o
SFX H o ujojn o
SFX H o ujon o
SFX I Y 130
SFX I a e a
SFX I a o a
SFX I a oj a
SFX I a ojn a
SFX I a on a
SFX I 0 j a
SFX I 0 jn a
SFX I 0 n a
SFX I e a e
SFX I e aj e
SFX I e ajn e
SFX I e an e
SFX I e ’ e
SFX I e ' e
SFX I e o e
SFX I e oj e
SFX I e ojn e
SFX I e on e
SFX I e ia e
SFX I e iaj e
SFX I e iajn e
SFX I e ian e
SFX I e ie e
SFX I e i’ e
SFX I e i' e
SFX I e io e
SFX I e ioj e
SFX I e iojn e
SFX I e ion e
SFX I e iaĵa e
SFX I e iaĵaj e
SFX I e iaĵajn e
SFX I e iaĵan e
SFX I e iaĵe e
SFX I e iaĵ’ e
SFX I e iaĵ' e
SFX I e iaĵo e
SFX I e iaĵoj e
SFX I e iaĵojn e
SFX I e iaĵon e
SFX I i a i
SFX I i aj i
SFX I i ajn i
SFX I i an i
SFX I i e i
SFX I i ’ i
SFX I i ' i
SFX I i o i
SFX I i oj i
SFX I i ojn i
SFX I i on i
SFX I 0 a i
SFX I 0 aj i
SFX I 0 ajn i
SFX I 0 an i
SFX I 0 ’ i
SFX I 0 ' i
SFX I 0 o i
SFX I 0 oj i
SFX I 0 ojn i
SFX I 0 on i
SFX I 0 n o
SFX I o io [^j]o
SFX I o ion [^j]o
SFX I ujo io ujo
SFX I ujo ion ujo
SFX I iana a iana
SFX I iana aj iana
SFX I iana ajn iana
SFX I iana an iana
SFX I iana e iana
SFX I ana a iana
SFX I ana aj iana
SFX I ana ajn iana
SFX I ana an iana
SFX I ana e iana
SFX I iana ana iana
SFX I iana anaj iana
SFX I iana anajn iana
SFX I iana anan iana
SFX I iana ane iana
SFX I iana an’ iana
SFX I iana an' iana
SFX I iana ano iana
SFX I iana anoj iana
SFX I iana anojn iana
SFX I iana anon iana
SFX I iana anina iana
SFX I iana aninaj iana
SFX I iana aninajn iana
SFX I iana aninan iana
SFX I iana anine iana
SFX I iana anin’ iana
SFX I iana anin' iana
SFX I iana anino iana
SFX I iana aninoj iana
SFX I iana aninojn iana
SFX I iana aninon iana
SFX I ujano iana ujano
SFX I ujano ianaj ujano
SFX I ujano ianajn ujano
SFX I ujano ianan ujano
SFX I ujano iane ujano
SFX I ujano ian’ ujano
SFX I ujano ian' ujano
SFX I ujano iano ujano
SFX I ujano ianoj ujano
SFX I ujano ianojn ujano
SFX I ujano ianon ujano
SFX I ujano ianina ujano
SFX I ujano ianinaj ujano
SFX I ujano ianinajn ujano
SFX I ujano ianinan ujano
SFX I ujano ianine ujano
SFX I ujano ianin’ ujano
SFX I ujano ianin' ujano
SFX I ujano ianino ujano
SFX I ujano ianinoj ujano
SFX I ujano ianinojn ujano
SFX I ujano ianinon ujano
SFX I jano ja ujano
SFX I jano jaj ujano
SFX I jano jajn ujano
SFX I jano jan ujano
SFX I jano je ujano
SFX I ujano ia ujano
SFX I ujano iaj ujano
SFX I ujano iajn ujano
SFX I ujano ian ujano
SFX I ujano ie ujano
SFX J Y 33
SFX J a eja a
SFX J a ejaj a
SFX J a ejajn a
SFX J a ejan a
SFX J a eje a
SFX J a ej’ a
SFX J a ej' a
SFX J a ejo a
SFX J a ejoj a
SFX J a ejojn a
SFX J a ejon a
SFX J i eja i
SFX J i ejaj i
SFX J i ejajn i
SFX J i ejan i
SFX J i eje i
SFX J i ej’ i
SFX J i ej' i
SFX J i ejo i
SFX J i ejoj i
SFX J i ejojn i
SFX J i ejon i
SFX J o eja o
SFX J o ejaj o
SFX J o ejajn o
SFX J o ejan o
SFX J o eje o
SFX J o ej’ o
SFX J o ej' o
SFX J o ejo o
SFX J o ejoj o
SFX J o ejojn o
SFX J o ejon o
SFX K N 44
SFX K 0 ra a
SFX K 0 raj a
SFX K 0 rajn a
SFX K 0 ran a
SFX K 0 re a
SFX K 0 r’ a
SFX K 0 r' a
SFX K 0 ro a
SFX K 0 roj a
SFX K 0 rojn a
SFX K 0 ron a
SFX K i ara i
SFX K i araj i
SFX K i arajn i
SFX K i aran i
SFX K i are i
SFX K i ar’ i
SFX K i ar' i
SFX K i aro i
SFX K i aroj i
SFX K i arojn i
SFX K i aron i
SFX K o ara o
SFX K o araj o
SFX K o arajn o
SFX K o aran o
SFX K o are o
SFX K o ar’ o
SFX K o ar' o
SFX K o aro o
SFX K o aroj o
SFX K o arojn o
SFX K o aron o
SFX K oj ara oj
SFX K oj araj oj
SFX K oj arajn oj
SFX K oj aran oj
SFX K oj are oj
SFX K oj ar’ oj
SFX K oj ar' oj
SFX K oj aro oj
SFX K oj aroj oj
SFX K oj arojn oj
SFX K oj aron oj
SFX L N 33
SFX L a igila a
SFX L a igilaj a
SFX L a igilajn a
SFX L a igilan a
SFX L a igile a
SFX L a igil’ a
SFX L a igil' a
SFX L a igilo a
SFX L a igiloj a
SFX L a igilojn a
SFX L a igilon a
SFX L 0 la i
SFX L 0 laj i
SFX L 0 lajn i
SFX L 0 lan i
SFX L 0 le i
SFX L 0 l’ i
SFX L 0 l' i
SFX L 0 lo i
SFX L 0 loj i
SFX L 0 lojn i
SFX L 0 lon i
SFX L o ila o
SFX L o ilaj o
SFX L o ilajn o
SFX L o ilan o
SFX L o ile o
SFX L o il’ o
SFX L o il' o
SFX L o ilo o
SFX L o iloj o
SFX L o ilojn o
SFX L o ilon o
SFX O Y 32
SFX O a ’ a
SFX O a ' a
SFX O a o a
SFX O a oj a
SFX O a ojn a
SFX O a on a
SFX O 0 j a
SFX O 0 jn a
SFX O 0 n a
SFX O i ’ i
SFX O i ' i
SFX O i o i
SFX O i oj i
SFX O i ojn i
SFX O i on i
SFX O o ’ o
SFX O o ' o
SFX O 0 j o
SFX O 0 jn o
SFX O 0 n o
SFX O oj e oj
SFX O 0 n oj
SFX O oj a oj
SFX O oj aj oj
SFX O oj ajn oj
SFX O oj an oj
SFX O u ’ u
SFX O u ' u
SFX O u o u
SFX O u oj u
SFX O u ojn u
SFX O u on u
