oo/vimspell/eo.dic
aeri/AOTH
afikso/AKOV
akceli/ALOQMTB
akto/HKOS
akuŝi/JLFOSV
akvaforto/AO
akvi/CHKLOS
albanujano/FI
aliĝi/AFVL
alo/AOX
amasa/AGOQ
analizo/OS
ananaso/AHO
anatome/I
angulo/CeLY
ankra/AOJ
ano/CFGKQV
argumento/KO
arĥeologe/FIS
armena/FGQ
artikoli/BGKT
artikoltitolo/AO
atenui/ALOQT
atmosferologe/FIS
avelo/AHO
baka/AHJSY
bakteriologe/FIS
baloti/AHLOV
bani/AHJOQT
bapti/AHJOQRSWT
barona/CFH
Belgujo/I
besta/ACGJKOY
biera/AOJ
bizanciana/FGIQ
bloki/LT
Bokareva/AOX
bola/AHL
bombono/AHO
bova/FJKSY
braĝo/AHO
breto/AKO
bretonujano/FI
brula/AeLOY
bula/AGOQ
Burjatujo/I
burokrata/ACFKYZ
butoni/AOT
ĉarti/AGJKOS
celi/KLT
ĉerizo/AJHO
cigara/AOJH
cigareda/AHO
cimo/AO
Ĉinujo/I
cirkonstanca/AKO
cirkuli/GV
cirkvitrompo/AOL
daktila/AHO
degutigi/TL
dekstrulo/FK
densometre/I
dentorado/AO
dentrado/AKO
deponi/TJY
detekti/ALT
digesti/AGOTHy
diplomata/ACK
diski/LT
doganpago/AO
dokumenti/AKOTHY
dormigi/L
drinki/AeGJOUVBY
dungito/FK_
ebeno/GJOQY
Ejrujo/I
eksporti/AOSTY
ekzekuti/ADGJLOST
ekzisti/AGVY
elspezi/BGKOT
emiro/AHO
enfali/HLV
enkesta/AGQS
ennovaĵo/AO?
entrepreni/ABSJOT
estingi/AOLQTB
Estonujo/I
estri/CGTB
ezofagoskope/I
fabli/AKSOV
fabriki/AOTY
faga/AKOJ
familiano/K
favori/AGMOTBY
fi-homo/O
fiki/ALTO
filmo/AeHO
financofico/JOS
fiziologe/FIS
flori/AHJKOSVY
fluida/ACGMOQY
foliumi/AOLT÷
forigebla/EOV
forna/ACJO
framasono/AKOZ
frambo/AHO
friti/ALTY
gaelo/CFGQY
Ĝafaro/AO
Galatujo/I
gardi/ASOLTJ
geaktoroj/KO
gejunuloj/KO
genealoge/FIS
generala/AKCO
gisi/AJOSTY
glacia/AGOQJHY
glacirivero/AO
gofri/LT
grado/GKOQ
grafologe/FIS
gujavo/AHO
haki/LOSTY
halta/GJ
Hamiltona/AOX
hela/ACeMGOQVY
higrometre/I
historiozofe/I
horloĝa/ASOH
horoskopo/AO
idea/AKSOZ
ideologe/IS
idola/AGOQWJ
ilo/AeHKO
indiki/ADLOqTY
infanvarti/AJV
inki/AOLTH
instalaĵo/AO
instigi/ALOTB
interspaca/AGO
intesta/AKOY
izoli/ASCLQTJOYZ
Jakutujo/I
juda/CJKSYZ
juglandarbo/AO
Jugoslavio/I
kaco/AeHO?
kalifo/ACHO
kampi/JKOSUV
kantona/AGOQ
kaprici/AOVB
kardi/ALOT
kardinala/AKCGO
Karelujo/I
karoba/AHO
kaŝi/LSJY
kazaĥujano/FI
kirasulo/AO
kirurge/FI
kliento/KF
knari/AOLV
knedi/TH
kokona/AOJ
komblano/AO
kompati/ABGOT
kompreniĝi/L
komputilo/eKOSY
komuniki/ADJLOTY
konservi/ADHJOQSTBZY
konsulo/CFJ
kontinentbreto/AO
kontraŭkoncipo/ALO
konverĝi/AJGOV
korni/KT
kosmografe/IS
krizo/AOCQ
kudri/JLOSTY
kuka/AJOS
kunveni/GJOV
Kurdujo/I
kvasto/AO
kverko/AKO
labori/AGJLOSUVY
lardi/AOLT
laŭto/GMOQ
lava/HJOS
legi/BDLOSY
lenso/AKO
lesivi/AJOT
Levantenujo/I
literkonturo/AO
liveri/ALOSTY
lokaĵo/K
lumu/dGkVz
magistrato/AJOW
malambigua/L
malariologe/FIS
mallevi/AOQRT
mango/AHO
maŝino/AKJOSZ
masto/AcKSO]
mebli/AKSOTY
Meksiko/I
mendi/AMOLT
meriti/AGOMTY
mespila/AHO
mikrometro/AO
Milano/I
mitulo/AJO
monaĥa/AGMQx
montrofingro/AO
moravujano/FI
mortigi/ALOS
morusa/AHO
muskolo/AKO
negoci/AOSVY
neŭtra/ACGY
nombri/ALOT
Nord-Kaŭkazo/I
novico/CFJ
novjorkiana/FI
oĉjo/AO
okcidento/GOQWYZ
olei/ACOLTHY
oranĝa/AOJH
orienti/LQTy
osta/AKOCQJ
ovoflavo/AO
paleografe/FIS
papera/AHOSY
paraŝuti/AGOSV
parlamenta/AOWJZ
paskvilo/AO
patagonujano/I
perfekta/ABCGOQUVY
peri/ALSTXY
persono/eGKOYZ
pesi/AOLTH
petrologe/I
pilastro/AO
pino/AJKO
pista/HY
pluformi/LT
pluri/CGQVZ
poento/AKO
pokalo/AeO
pomo/AeHO
prefekto/FJH_
preterŝovi/OQT
principa/AKO
profiti/ALMOV^
proleto/GKFQ
provi/BDLY
provizi/AJOQTY
prunela/AHO
psiĥiatre/FI
pufseĝo/AO
rajdanto/FK[
refi/LO?
regado/AJO
reguli/ACGKLOTY
relikvo/AHO
rezervista/KO
rigardi/AakLlOopRrT÷_^[]
riverenci/AOV
rizo/AJO
roza/AOQJH
rusujano/FI
saga/AHOS
saĝega/ACGMOQU
salika/AOJY
ŝarĝa/AHMOQSY
satrape/I
ŝaŭmi/GkV
sekvanto/FK
semi/ALOY
senato/AJOW
senbrua/AGQO
senesprima/AG
senĝoja/AGQ
senkalka/AGQ
senkresta/AG
senmona/AGQ
senpaka/AG
senrezerva/AGQ
senŝlima/AGQ
senvesta/AGQ
senzorga/AJ
ŝipi/AKSOV
sismografe/I
skuti/LV
ŝlimi/AOVJ
slovakujano/FI
somertago/AO
sorpo/AHO
sputi/TH
ŝraŭbi/aGT
stapli/AJOT
stela/AKOU
stiri/ALJOST
stomatologe/I
ŝtupara/AJO
suĉi/AkLlGOTvz
supo/AHO
surtabla/AG
svedujano/FI
tani/JLST
tegi/LMRT
teknokrate/FI
telerbreto/AOK
terproduktaĵo/AO
testiko/AHO
titoli/AKOUT
torfo/AJO
transporti/LO
trufi/JOT
trusti/AGOT
tuno/AKO
Turkmenujo/I
tuŝludo/AO
Unikso/HO
varii/ABGJOVY
velo/AOK[
vertikala/ACOLV
veturi/AafkGJjLlORVz
vezika/AGOQ
vinbero/AHJKOS
virina/ACGJKOQ
Vitelio/AO?
Vjetnamujo/I
